Washington statutes.
RCW 41.44.060

Persons excluded.

Police officers in first-class cities and all city firefighters shall be excluded from the provisions of this chapter, except those employees of the fire department who are not eligible to the benefits of any firefighters' pension system established by or pursuant to state law, and who shall be included in the miscellaneous personnel.

[ 2007 c 218 s 71; 1951 c 275 s 3; 1947 c 71 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9592-135.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.

Firefighters' relief and pensions: Chapters 41.16, 41.18 RCW.

Police relief and pensions in first-class cities: Chapter 41.20 RCW.

Volunteer firefighters' relief and pensions: Chapter 41.24 RCW.